prince/dictionaries/he-IL.dic
אגרפך/S
אהבכם/S
אווררם/S
אוששני/S
אזנכם/S
אחדך/S
אחסנך/S
אכזבך/S
אכפכם/S
אלצכם/S
אמדכן/S
אסלמך/S
אספכן/S
אפות/S
ארגנכם/S
אשפזך/S
אשרם/S
אשררן/S
אששנו/S
בדקם/S
בהוק/S
בודדני/S
בזותכם/S
בזזכן/S
בזרם/S
בחנכן/S
בחרם/S
בטאן/S
ביישך/S
בלעכם/S
בנותכם/S
בסמכם/S
בססכם/S
בערני/S
בקשכן/S
בראם/S
בשלם/S
בתרנו/S
גבבך/S
גבשך/S
גדעך/S
גזלך/S
גחכם/S
גייסן/S
גלחה/S
גמדני/S
געת/S
דבררכן/S
דונך/S
דחותו/S
דחסך/S
דחקכם/S
דכאכן/S
דכדכם/S
דלותנו/S
דפנן/S
דקלמני/S
דרגני/S
האביסכם/S
האדירכן/S
האהיבם/S
האכילן/S
האפילנו/S
האצילני/S
האשימך/S
הבדילכם/S
הבהילכן/S
הבהירם/S
הבטיחן/S
הביאנו/S
הביכני/S
הביסני/S
הבליטך/S
הבליעכם/S
הבנותך/S
הבעירכם/S
הבעיתכן/S
הבקיעם/S
הבריגן/S
הבריחנו/S
הבריקני/S
הגביהך/S
הגבילכם/S
הגבירכן/S
הגדילם/S
הגדירן/S
הגירן/S
הגישנו/S
הגלותם/S
הגמישן/S
הגעילנו/S
הגרילני/S
הדאיגך/S
הדביקכם/S
הדבירכן/S
הדגימם/S
הדגירן/S
הדגישנו/S
הדהימני/S
הדחיקך/S
הדיחכם/S
הדירכן/S
הדליפם/S
הדליקן/S
הדמימנו/S
הדפיסני/S
הדריככם/S
הובילן/S
הוגיענו/S
הודיעני/S
הוזילני/S
הולידני/S
הונות/S
הועידך/S
הוציאכם/S
הוקיעכן/S
הוקירם/S
הורידם/S
הורישן/S
הושיבנו/S
הושיטני/S
הותירך/S
הזהירכם/S
הזיזכם/S
הזינכן/S
הזכירם/S
הזליפן/S
הזמיננו/S
הזנותן/S
הזניחנו/S
הזניקני/S
הזקיפך/S
הזרימכם/S
הזריעכן/S
הזריקם/S
החביאן/S
החדירנו/S
החזיקנו/S
החזירני/S
החיות/S
החיותנו/S
החילני/S
החכירך/S
החליאכם/S
החליפכן/S
החליקם/S
החלישן/S
החמיצנו/S
החנותם/S
החריבן/S
החרידנו/S
החרימני/S
החרישך/S
החשיככם/S
החתימכן/S
הטבילם/S
הטביען/S
הטותכן/S
הטיחם/S
הטילן/S
הטיסנו/S
הטליאני/S
הטמיעך/S
הטעותה/S
הטעותני/S
הטעינך/S
הטרידכם/S
הטריחכן/S
היגלות/S
הילוות/S
הישבות/S
הכהות/S
הכותן/S
הכזיבנו/S
הכחידני/S
הכילני/S
הכירך/S
הכישכם/S
הכליבכן/S
הכלילם/S
הכלימן/S
הכניסנו/S
הכניעני/S
הכעיסך/S
הכפילכם/S
הכפיפכן/S
הכפישם/S
הכריחן/S
הכריענו/S
הכריתני/S
הכשירך/S
הכתיבכם/S
הכתימכן/S
הכתירם/S
הלאותכם/S
הלאימכן/S
הלבינם/S
הלבישן/S
הלהיבנו/S
הלהיטני/S
הלוותנו/S
הלחימני/S
הלחיצך/S
הללך/S
הלעיטכם/S
הלקותו/S
המות/S
המטירך/S
המירכם/S
המיתכן/S
המליחנו/S
המליכני/S
המעידכם/S
המציאכן/S
המרידם/S
המריצן/S
המשיכנו/S
המשילני/S
הנביטך/S
הנהיגכם/S
הנחותך/S
הנחילכם/S
הנחיתכן/S
הניאנו/S
הניחני/S
הניעך/S
הניפכם/S
הניקכן/S
הנמיכם/S
הנפיקן/S
הנפישנו/S
הנציחני/S
הסבירך/S
הסבכם/S
הסגירם/S
הסדירן/S
הסוותם/S
הסיגם/S
הסיטן/S
הסיענו/S
הסירני/S
הסמיכך/S
הסעירכם/S
הספיגכן/S
הספידם/S
הסריטן/S
הסתירנו/S
העבידני/S
העדיפך/S
העיפך/S
העכירך/S
העלותה/S
העלותני/S
העלימך/S
העמידכם/S
העמיקכן/S
העניקם/S
הענישן/S
העסיקנו/S
העציבני/S
העריכך/S
הערימכם/S
העריצכן/S
העשירם/S
העתיקן/S
הפגיזנו/S
הפגישני/S
הפחיתך/S
הפילכם/S
הפיצכן/S
הפיקם/S
הפליטם/S
הפלילן/S
הפנותכן/S
הפנימם/S
הפסיקן/S
הפעימני/S
הפקיעך/S
הפקירכם/S
הפרידכם/S
הפריטם/S
הפריענו/S
הפשילך/S
הפתיעכן/S
הצחיקן/S
הציגני/S
הציפכם/S
הצליבם/S
הצמיחנו/S
הצעידך/S
הצרידכן/S
הקדישנו/S
הקהילן/S
הקטירני/S
הקימכם/S
הקישם/S
הקליטנו/S
הקפיאן/S
הקצותן/S
הקציעני/S
הקריבכם/S
הקרינם/S
הקשיחם/S
הרבותו/S
הרגילכם/S
הרגישם/S
הרדימני/S
הרוותני/S
הרטיבך/S
הריחכן/S
הריצן/S
הרכיבני/S
הרעיבם/S
הרעילנו/S
הרפות/S
הרקידני/S
הרתיחך/S
השאילכן/S
השביחן/S
השביתני/S
השוותם/S
השחילנו/S
השחיתך/S
השיבכן/S
השיטן/S
השימני/S
השכיחכם/S
השכימם/S
השכירנו/S
השלימך/S
השמיטכן/S
השמיצן/S
השניאני/S
השעיננו/S
השקותנו/S
השרותה/S
השרישך/S
השתיקכן/S
התאימן/S
התחילן/S
התיכני/S
התניעך/S
התפיחכן/S
התקינן/S
וותר/S
זייננו/S
זקפן/S
חבבכן/S
חדדם/S
חזקני/S
חממך/S
חמשכם/S
חסלנו/S
חפשני/S
חשלכן/S
חתלני/S
טלטלך/S
טמטמכן/S
טנפן/S
ייבשכם/S
יידען/S
ייסרן/S
ייצגכם/S
יישבך/S
יישנן/S
כבסה/S
כיילם/S
כפותכם/S
כרתך/S
לדתכן/S
לטפן/S
לכסנני/S
מגרם/S
מחצן/S
מלטני/S
מנותו/S
מסותך/S
מצותכן/S
מקדנו/S
מרטכם/S
מתנכם/S
נדבם/S
נהלני/S
נטשני/S
נסותנו/S
נפחני/S
נצחני/S
נקותו/S
נשוק/S
נתצם/S
סווגך/S
סחטם/S
סכלן/S
סכרני/S
סלקכם/S
סננכן/S
סקלכן/S
עדכנכם/S
עודדם/S
עכבנו/S
עמלנני/S
ענותו/S
עסותנו/S
עקפך/S
ערבבן/S
עשותם/S
פארני/S
פוצצך/S
פטמכן/S
פלות/S
פעות/S
פרסמם/S
פשקכן/S
פתרך/S
צטטנו/S
צמוח/S
צרככן/S
קדשכם/S
קחתה/S
קטלכם/S
קלוח/S
קנות/S
קנחנו/S
רגמן/S
רהטני/S
רככך/S
רמותכם/S
רססם/S
רעננני/S
רתקה/S
שאתה/S
שבותנו/S
שגעם/S
שדרגך/S
שזפן/S
שחטכן/S
שכחכם/S
שכפלן/S
שלותן/S
שלקך/S
שמעני/S
שעבדך/S
שעשעם/S
שפדני/S
שקמכם/S
שרבבכן/S
שתפם/S
תבלכן/S
תגברני/S
תזמרכם/S
תייגן/S
תסכלך/S
תעדם/S
תפשכן/S
תקצבני/S
תתן/S
